Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 18A State Personnel
18A.130.
Reemployment of career employee terminated on or after January 1, 1980.

A career employee whose employment is terminated on or after January 1, 1980, by lay-off, dismissal, other than for cause, and, in the case of an unclassified management employee, resignation other than resignation in lieu of dismissal for cause, shall, upon his written request, be reemployed or placed on reemployment lists in accordance with this section and KRS

18A.135

.

If the career employee has previously attained status in a position in the classified service, he shall revert to a position in that class in the agency from which he was terminated if a vacancy in that class exists. If no such vacancy exists, he shall be considered for employment in any vacant position for which he is qualified pursuant to the reemployment procedures.

If the career employee has not previously attained status in the classified service or if he has attained status but no vacancy exists in a position to which subsection (2) of this section applies, the employee shall be placed on reemployment lists for any positions for which he is qualified.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 26, effective July 15, 1982.

18A.135.
Reemployment of career employees.

Any career employee who has been laid-off or dismissed, other than for cause, and, in the case of an unclassified management employee, resignation other than resignation in lieu of dismissal for cause, shall automatically be placed on the reemployment list for the class from which he was terminated. If a career employee wishes to be on the reemployment list for other classes of positions for which he is qualified and passes the appropriate selection method, he shall notify the cabinet in writing.

If more than one (1) career employee requests to be placed on the reemployment list for any job classification, the cabinet shall list the names of such career employees in the order of their seniority.

No vacancy may be filled from a competitive register until all career employees on the reemployment list for that class of position have denied employment in that class. An appointing authority may refuse to reemploy a qualified employee on the reemployment list only for cause. The secretary and the employee shall be furnished with a written statement of the specific reasons for the refusal within ten (10) days following the appointing authority’s refusal. The employee may appeal the appointing authority’s action in accordance with KRS

18A.095

and

18A.100

.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 27, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 154, § 33, effective July 15, 1998.

18A.138.
Affirmative action plan for state government.

To ensure equal employment opportunity for all Kentuckians regardless of race, color, religion, national origin, disability, sex, or age, the affirmative action plan dated July 1, 1984, confirmed as part of Executive Order 84-549 continued in force by Executive Order 88-100, and incorporated herein by reference, shall be the official affirmative action plan for Kentucky state government. Copies of the plan, as well as the plans developed by individual agencies pursuant to the state plan, shall be maintained on file and made available for inspection in the Office of the Secretary of Personnel.

Every program cabinet, department, and agency of state government shall comply with the provisions of the affirmative action plan.

Equal employment opportunities shall be an integral part of each cabinet, department, and agency program, and any program evaluation shall include an assessment of equal opportunity performance.

The secretary of personnel shall be responsible for the implementation of the plan. In fulfilling his duties, he shall:

Require all cabinets, departments, and agencies of state government to develop programs consistent with the plan;

Provide any technical assistance he may deem appropriate to accomplish the purposes of the plan;

Provide, through the Personnel Cabinet, an annual analysis to ensure that persons protected by antidiscrimination laws are not adversely affected by examination and selection procedures;

Provide for validation of examination procedures;

Provide for procedures to monitor appointments and salary adjustments to ensure that standards are uniformly applied so as to prevent salary disparity;

Report to the Governor semiannually on actions taken pursuant to the plan; and

Review the plan on an annual basis and recommend necessary changes in consultation with the appropriate agencies.

The secretary of personnel may also:

Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with this chapter and KRS Chapter 13A to implement the affirmative action plan;

Implement programs to ensure that reasonable accommodations exist for persons with disabilities to allow them better access to all employment opportunities in state government; and

Appoint an affirmative action advisory committee to assist him in implementation of the affirmative action plan.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 127, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 309, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 405, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 154, § 34, effective July 15, 1998.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Executive Order 92-1059, excluding complaints of sexual harassment from the Open Records Act, has not been enacted into law; whatever binding effect this Order may have on state agencies generally, having not been adopted by the General Assembly, it does not operate as a statutory enactment of that body restricting confidential records relating to complaints of sexual harassment in state government, which are therefore not excluded from public inspection by KRS

61.878

. OAG 98-ORD-45.

18A.140.
Prohibition against discrimination and political activities.

No person shall be appointed or promoted to, or demoted or dismissed from, any position in the classified service, or in any way favored or discriminated against with respect to employment in the classified services because of his political or religious opinions, affiliations, ethnic origin, sex, race or disability. No person over the age of forty (40) shall be discriminated against because of age.

No person shall use or promise to use, directly or indirectly, any official authority or influence, whether possessed or anticipated, to secure or attempt to secure for any person an appointment or advantage in appointment to a position in the classified service, or an increase in pay or other advantage in employment in any such position, for the purpose of influencing the vote or political action of any person.

No employee in the classified service or member of the board or its executive director or secretary shall, directly or indirectly, pay or promise to pay any assessment for political purposes, or solicit or take any part in soliciting for any political party, or solicit or take any part in soliciting any political assessment, subscription, contribution, or service. No person shall solicit any political assessment, subscription, contribution, or service of any employee in the classified service.

No employee in the classified service or member of the board or its executive director shall be a member of any national, state, or local committee of a political party, or an officer or member of a committee of a partisan political club, or a candidate for nomination or election to any paid partisan public office, or shall take part in the management or affairs of any political party or in any political campaign, except to exercise his right as a citizen privately to express his opinion and to cast his vote. Officers or employees of the classified service may be candidates for and occupy an elected office if the election is on a nonpartisan basis, the officers or employees have complied with the requirements of KRS

61.080

, and the duties of the elective office do not interfere with, or create any conflicts of interest with, the state duties of the officers or employees in the classified service. An employee shall give notice to his or her appointing authority of his or her intent to run for elective office upon filing to run for the office.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 28, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 494, § 19, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 405, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 154, § 35, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 153, § 11, effective April 13, 2010.

18A.145.
Other acts prohibited.

No person shall make any false statement, certificate, mark, rating, or report with regard to any test, certification, or appointment made under any provision of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

or in any manner commit or attempt to commit any fraud preventing the impartial execution of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

and the rules, regulations or orders thereunder.

No person shall, directly or indirectly, give, render, pay, offer, solicit, or accept any money, service, or other valuable consideration for or on account of any appointment, proposed appointment, promotion, or proposed promotion to, or any advantage in, a position in the classified service.

No employee of the cabinet, examiner, or other person shall defeat, deceive, or obstruct any person in his right to examination, eligibility, certification, or appointment under KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

, or furnish to any person any special or secret information for the purpose of affecting the rights or prospects of any person with respect to employment in the classified service.

No person shall make any false statement, record, or report regarding hours, days, or other time worked by any employee. No person shall falsely prepare any payroll document or record relating to the pay for any employee.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 29, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 154, § 36, effective July 15, 1998.

18A.146.
Felony conviction grounds for disciplinary action.

As used in this section, “state employee” means a person regularly appointed to a position in the state service, whether classified or unclassified, for which he is compensated on a full-time or part-time basis.

Subject to the provisions of KRS

18A.095

, any state employee who is convicted of a felony may be subject to any disciplinary action deemed appropriate, including dismissal from the state service.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 203, § 5, effective July 15, 1988.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.150.
Interview preference for current service members, honorably or generally discharged former service members, and members’ spouses, surviving spouses, and dependent parents — Required interviews.

Interview preference to a competitive classified position for which he or she meets the minimum qualifications established for the job classification shall apply to:

Any person who has served in the Armed Forces of the United States, Reserves, or National Guard who was discharged or released therefrom with an honorable discharge, discharge under honorable conditions, or a general discharge, or his or her spouse or unmarried widow or widower;

The unmarried widow or widower of any military personnel who died while in the Armed Forces of the United States, Reserves, or National Guard, unless circumstances surrounding the death was cause for other than honorable or general discharge separation; and

Any current member of the Armed Forces of the United States, Reserves, or National Guard or his or her spouse.

A parent totally or partially dependent on a person who has served in the Armed Forces of the United States, Reserves, or National Guard and lost his or her life under honorable conditions while on active duty or active duty for training purposes or became permanently and totally disabled as a result of a service-connected disability shall have interview preference to a competitive classified position for which he or she meets the minimum qualifications established for the job classification.

Applicants entitled to interview preference as set forth in this section shall be clearly identified.

If the number of individuals identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection is less than five (5), the employing agency shall offer an interview to all individuals identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

If the number of individuals identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection equals or exceeds five (5), the employing agency shall offer an interview to no fewer than five (5).

Interview preference shall only apply to candidates seeking initial appointment to the classified service.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 30, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 109, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 129, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 180, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 154, § 37, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 4, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 42, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 109, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

18A.155.
Rules for unclassified employees.

The secretary shall prepare and submit proposed administrative regulations to the Governor for employees in unclassified positions enumerated in KRS 18A.115(1)(g), (h), (i), (j), (k), (p), (t), and (u). Such administrative regulations shall become effective after approval by the Governor and promulgation in accordance with KRS Chapters 12 and 13A. The administrative regulations shall provide:

For the preparation, maintenance, and revision of a position classification plan for all aforementioned positions in the unclassified service, based upon similarity of duties performed and responsibilities assumed, so that the same qualifications may reasonably be required for and the same schedule of pay may be equitably applied to all positions in the same class. After such classification plan has been approved by the Governor, the secretary shall allocate the positions of every employee in the unclassified service to one (1) of the classes of the plan. Any employee affected by the allocation of a position to a class shall, after filing with the secretary a written request for reconsideration thereof in such manner and form as the secretary may prescribe, be given a reasonable opportunity to be heard thereon by the secretary;

For a pay plan for all aforementioned employees in the unclassified service, after consultation with appointing authorities and the state budget director, and taking into account such factors as:

The relative levels of duties and responsibilities of various classes of positions;

Rates paid for comparable positions elsewhere; and

The state’s financial resources.

Such pay plan shall become effective only after it has been approved by the Governor after submission to him by the secretary. Amendments to the pay plan may be made in the same manner. Each employee shall be paid at one (1) of the rates set forth in the pay plan for the position in which he is employed;

For transfer from a position in one (1) department to a similar position in another department involving similar qualifications, duties, responsibilities, and salary ranges;

For annual, sick, and special leaves of absence, with or without pay, or reduced pay, after approval by the Governor as provided in subsection (1) of this section;

For the development and operation of programs to improve the work effectiveness and morale of employees in the unclassified service, including training, safety, health, welfare, counseling, recreation, and employee relations; and

For such other rules and administrative regulations not inconsistent with KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

, as may be proper and necessary for its enforcement.

Nothing herein shall be construed to preclude the optional use of administrative regulations promulgated under this section on behalf of employees enumerated in KRS 18A.115(1)(a), (b), (d), (e), (p), (u), and (w) and on behalf of members of state boards and commissions who work on a full-time, salaried basis.

Months of service earned as a contract employee of the Kentucky Department of Education shall be recognized and credited as service credit for calculating years of service in any public agency position held subsequent to the employment by contract. The provisions of this subsection are retroactive for employees hired in a public agency position on or after January 1, 1997.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 52, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 448, § 31, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 494, § 20, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 154, § 38, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 487, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 540, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

18A.160.
Use of public buildings, property, and facilities.

All office space, property, and equipment including, but not limited to, desks, office supplies, typewriters, machinery, and implements utilized at hearings and in recording and processing transcripts and other work of the board, heretofore used by the board, shall become the property of the board.

All officers and employees of the Commonwealth and of all its municipalities and political subdivisions shall allow the cabinet and the board the reasonable use of public buildings under their control, and furnish heat, light, and furniture for any examination, hearing, or investigation authorized by KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

. The cabinet and the board, as appropriate, shall pay to a municipality or political subdivision the reasonable cost of any such facilities furnished by it.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 32, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 154, § 39, effective July 15, 1998.

18A.165.
Administration of KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200.

All officers and employees of the Commonwealth shall comply with, and aid in all proper ways in carrying out, the provisions of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

and the rules, regulations, and orders of the board thereunder. All officers and employees shall furnish any records or information pertaining to the administration of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

which the secretary or the board may request. The secretary or the board may require the Attorney General to institute and maintain such legal action as the secretary or the board may consider necessary or appropriate to secure compliance with KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200 and the rules and orders thereunder.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 33, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 154, § 40, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 487, § 6, effective July 15, 1998.

18A.170.
Certification of division directors who do not make policy.

It is further provided that the responsible departmental, board, commission or agency head shall at the time at which he elects to come under the provisions of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

, certify to the board the positions of those division directors or heads under their jurisdiction whose duties are nonpolicy making together with a sufficient statement of their duties to enable the board to determine whether or not, as a matter of fact, such duties are nonpolicy making in their nature. He shall, at any time subsequent to coming under the provisions of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

certify to the board additional division directors or heads whose duties are nonpolicy making. At the time of certification notice thereof shall be given to the interested division director or head in the form of a copy of the statement certifying the duties of his office. The board may conduct such hearings as it may deem necessary, and shall conduct hearings pursuant to the administrative provisions of KRS

18A.095

in the event of a difference of opinion between the certifying officer and the interested division director or head, before entering its findings of fact and an order either classifying or denying classification to such position. Either the certifying officer or the division director or head may appeal the findings of fact and the final order of the board by initiating action in the Franklin Circuit Court pursuant to the provisions of KRS

418.040

et seq.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 34, effective July 15, 1982.

18A.175.
Evaluation of duties of division directors or heads — Procedure when duties have become policy making.

The responsible departmental, board, commission or agency head shall periodically evaluate the duties of those division directors or heads placed under the classified service pursuant to the provisions of KRS

18A.170

, and shall determine whether the duties of such directors or heads have become policy making in their nature. If it is determined that the duties of such directors and heads are policy making, the responsible agency head shall certify that fact to the board. At the time of certification, notice thereof shall be given to the interested division director or head in a form of a copy of the statement certifying the policy making duties of his office. The board may conduct such hearings as it may deem necessary, and shall conduct hearings pursuant to the administrative provisions of KRS

18A.095

in the event of a difference of opinion between the certifying officer and the interested division director or head, before entering its findings of fact and an order either removing the position from the classified service or retaining it within the classified service. Either the certifying officer or the division director or head may appeal the findings of fact and the final order of the board by initiating action in the Franklin Circuit Court pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 418.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 35, effective July 15, 1982.

18A.180.
Extension of system to other governmental units.

Subject to the approval of the board, the secretary may enter into agreements with any municipality or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth to furnish services and facilities of the cabinet to the municipality or political subdivision in the administration of its personnel on merit principles. Any such agreement shall provide for the reimbursement to the cabinet, under contract, of the reasonable cost of the services and facilities furnished, as determined by the secretary. All municipalities and political subdivisions of the Commonwealth are hereby authorized to enter into these agreements.

The secretary may cooperate with the governmental agencies of other jurisdictions charged with personnel administration in conducting joint tests and establishing joint lists from which eligibles shall be certified for appointment in accordance with the provisions of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

.

The secretary may, upon the request of the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and upon the approval of the board, furnish merit system services to “local” departments of health.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 36, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 154, § 41, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 78, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 96, effective June 20, 2005.

18A.185.
Service as elected official deemed full-time employment for specified purpose.

For the purpose of any regulation issued under KRS

18A.110

or

18A.155

governing entitlement to annual leave days, sick leave days or the accumulation of such leave days, any period of service as an elected state official, including but not limited to service in the General Assembly, by any officer or employee to whom such regulation applies shall be considered to have been full-time employment in the state service.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 37, effective July 15, 1982.

18A.190.
Holidays for state personnel — Military spouses to receive paid deployment and return days off.

State offices shall be closed and state employees shall be given a holiday on the following days:

The first day of January plus one (1) extra day;

The third Monday in January;

Good Friday, one-half (1/2) day;

The last Monday in May;

The fourth day of July;

The first Monday in September;

The eleventh day of November;

Presidential election day as required under KRS

2.190

;

The fourth Thursday in November plus one (1) extra day; and

The twenty-fifth day of December plus one (1) extra day.

When any of the days enumerated in subsection (1) falls on a Saturday, the preceding Friday shall be observed as the holiday, and when any of the days enumerated in subsection (1) falls on a Sunday, the following Monday shall be observed as the holiday. When one (1) extra day is mentioned in paragraphs (a), (i) and (j) of subsection (1), the Governor shall designate the extra day.

Any state employee who is the spouse of a member of the United States Armed Forces, including a member of a state National Guard or a Reserve component on federal active duty, shall receive, at the discretion of the state employee, one (1) day off, with pay, from work when the member is deployed and one (1) day off, with pay, from work when the member returns from deployment.

The holidays set out in this section are in addition to vacation leave and other benefits of state employees.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 38, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 25, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 576, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 252, § 8, effective April 25, 2006.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

18.350

and was repealed, reenacted and amended as this section by Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 38.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.194.
Living Organ Donor Leave Program.

As used in this section:

“Human organ” means any part of a human intestine, kidney, liver, lung, or pancreas;

“Living donor” means a full-time employee of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of the Commonwealth of Kentucky who is absent from work due to medical reasons associated with donating a human organ or bone marrow; and

“Living organ donor leave” means a paid leave of absence provided to a living donor for time off work from the donation of a human organ or bone marrow and the recovery time associated with the donation; and

“Living organ donor leave” does not include any other form of paid leave that has been granted by the living donor’s employer.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky Living Organ Donor Leave Program is created. A living donor may request to receive living organ donor leave for donating a human organ or bone marrow.

Before being approved to receive any amount of living organ donor leave, the living donor shall submit verification of the human organ or bone marrow donation procedure to his or her employer.

Once approved, a living donor shall be granted living organ donor leave in an amount of:

Two hundred forty (240) hours for each human organ donation; and

Forty (40) hours for each bone marrow donation.

A living donor may be approved to receive living organ donor leave each time the living donor donates a human organ or bone marrow.

A living donor shall not be required to use compensatory time, sick leave, or annual leave before being eligible to receive living organ donor leave.

While a living donor is on living organ donor leave, he or she shall be deemed a state employee and shall receive the same treatment with respect to salary, wages, and employee benefits.

For purposes of determining seniority, pay or pay advancement, performance awards, and the receipt of any benefit that may be affected by a leave of absence, the service of the living donor shall be considered uninterrupted by the leave of absence.

The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.195.
Compensatory time — Payment upon leaving state service.

A state employee who is authorized to work one (1) or more hours in excess of the prescribed hours of duty shall be granted compensatory leave on an hour-for-hour basis. Upon the written request of an employee who is not exempt from the provisions of the Federal Fair Labor Standards Act, 29

U.S.C. sec. 201

et seq., an appointing authority may grant compensatory time, in lieu of overtime pay, at the rate of one and one-half (1.5) hours for each hour the employee is authorized to work in excess of forty (40) hours in a work week. An employee who is transferred or otherwise changed from the jurisdiction of one agency to another shall retain his compensatory leave in the receiving agency.

An employee in a position listed in KRS 18A.115(1)(d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), or (k) shall not be eligible to receive any level of block payment for compensatory leave hours, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

Any employee who leaves state service shall be paid for the balance of unused compensatory time not to exceed two hundred forty (240) hours.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 39, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 180, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 495, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 153, § 12, effective April 13, 2010.

18A.196.
Definitions for KRS 18A.197.

As used in KRS

18A.197

unless the context requires otherwise:

“Employee” means any employee of the Commonwealth of Kentucky who is entitled to accrue sick leave and for whom accurate leave records are maintained; and

“State agency” or “agency” means any agency of the executive, legislative or judicial branch of the state government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 483, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.197.
Sick-leave sharing program.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky sick leave sharing program is created. An employee who has accrued a sick leave balance of more than seventy-five (75) hours may request that the appointing authority of the agency for which the employee works makes available for transfer a specified amount of his or her sick leave balance to another named employee authorized to receive leave under subsection (2) of this section. The employee may not request a transfer of an amount of leave that would result in reducing his or her sick leave balance to less than seventy-five (75) hours.

An appointing authority, with the approval of the secretary of personnel, may permit an employee of the agency to receive leave under this section if:

The employee or a member of his or her immediate family suffers from a medically certified illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition which has caused, or is likely to cause, the employee to go on leave for at least ten (10) consecutive working days;

The employee’s need for absence and use of leave are certified by a licensed practicing physician or advanced practice registered nurse;

The employee has exhausted his or her accumulated sick leave, annual leave, and compensatory leave balances; and

The employee has complied with administrative regulations governing the use of sick leave.

The appointing authority, with the approval of the secretary of personnel, shall determine the amount of leave, if any, which an employee within his or her agency may receive under subsection (2) of this section. Transfers of leave shall not exceed the amount requested by the recipient.

Leave may be transferred from an employee of one (1) agency to an employee within the same agency. With the approval of the secretary of personnel and of the appointing authorities of both agencies, leave may be transferred from an employee of one (1) agency to an employee of another state agency. The Personnel Cabinet shall maintain records of leave transferred between employees and the utilization of transferred leave.

While an employee is on leave transferred under this section, he or she shall be deemed a state employee and shall receive the same treatment with respect to salary, wages and employee benefits.

All salary and wage payments made to an employee while on leave transferred under this section shall be made by the agency employing the person receiving the leave.

Any leave transferred under this section which remains unused shall be returned to the employees who transferred the leave when the appointing authority finds that the leave is no longer needed and will not be needed at a future time in connection with the illness or injury for which the leave was transferred to an employee in his agency.

No employee shall directly or indirectly intimidate, threaten, or coerce, or attempt to intimidate, threaten, or coerce any other employee for the purpose of interfering with the employee’s right to voluntarily contribute leave when authorized under this section. For the purpose of this subsection, “intimidate, threaten, or coerce” shall include, without being limited to, the promise to confer or the conferring of any benefit or effecting or threatening to effect any reprisal.

The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall promulgate procedural administrative regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 483, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 154, § 42, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 97, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 85, § 68, effective July 15, 2010.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.200.
Per diem salaries for state officers or employees serving on boards or commissions prohibited during regular working hours — Reimbursement of expenses authorized.

No state officer or employee who is required by statute or regulation to serve on any board, commission or other body in an official capacity shall receive a per diem salary for the attendance of meetings or performance of services during regular working hours.

Any state officer or employee who is required by statute or regulation or who is elected or appointed to serve on any board, commission or other body in an official capacity shall receive reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses in accordance with state regulations and standards.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 40, effective July 15, 1982.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

18.370

and was repealed, reenacted and amended as this section by Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 40.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.201.
Transportation Engineering Assistant I experience requirements.

Beginning on July 12, 2006, the requirement of two (2) years of experience related to one (1) or more transportation engineering programs for the job classification of Transportation Engineering Assistant I shall not apply as an experience requirement for the classification. Any applicant who has obtained a high school diploma or received a High School Equivalency Diploma shall be deemed to have met the educational requirements necessary for the Transportation Engineering Assistant I classification and shall be allowed to take the relevant written examination for the classification.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 131, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2017 ch. 63, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.

18A.202.
Work-related incentive programs for state employees.

The secretary is authorized to install and implement by administrative regulation work-related incentive programs for state employees. Such programs may include, but need not be limited to, an employee suggestion system whereby employees in the classified service and employees falling under KRS Chapter 16 may be recognized and rewarded for submitting suggestions that result in the improvement of state service or in the realization of financial savings by the state. Such programs may provide that when an employee suggestion has been adopted and resulted in a financial savings to the state, the employee who submitted the suggestion may be compensated for his service through a cash bonus in an amount to the lesser of ten percent (10%) of the amount saved or two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow KRS Chapter 16 employees to collect any fees or rewards for performance of acts in the line of duty as prohibited in KRS

16.110

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 332, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 23, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 494, § 21, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 154, § 43, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 139, § 7, effective June 26, 2007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The sworn officers of the Kentucky State Police cannot avail themselves of this section and 101 KAR 1::150 and receive incentive payments for suggestions which lead to financial savings to the state.

OAG 87-5

.

One time payments to teachers to induce retirement are constitutional under Const., § 3 as such payments are in consideration of public service. The key fact that makes these payments constitutional is the voluntary retirement of the teacher; such an act is a “present” service for which an emolument is paid, not a past service for which a gratuity is given.

OAG 96-23

.